Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201616-220
Officers; reports; required; when.

A city of the first class may require from any officer of the city at any time a report in detail of the transactions in his or her office or of any matters connected therewith.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XXV, p. 251;

R.S.1913, § 4836;

C.S.1922, § 4004;

C.S.1929, § 16-221;

R.S.1943, § 16-220;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 26.
July 21, 2016